Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. Administration

§ 527.
Composition of the Board; qualification of members; term of office.

A Board of Chiropractic is created. The Board shall consist of five members. Board members shall be appointed by the Governor pursuant to

3 V.S.A. §§ 129b

and 2004.

Three members of the Board shall be chiropractors licensed and in good standing in this State who are graduates of an accredited school of chiropractic and who reside and have resided and actively practiced chiropractic in this State during the two years immediately preceding their appointments. Two members shall be members of the public. A public member shall not be a member of any health-related licensing Board or profession or have a financial interest personally or through a spouse, parent, or sibling in the activities regulated under this chapter, other than as consumers or possible consumers of chiropractic services.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 236

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2005, No. 27

, § 32.

§ 528.
Board procedures.

Annually the Board shall elect from among its members a chair, vice chair, and secretary, each to serve for one year. No person shall serve as Chair or Vice Chair for more than three consecutive years.

, (c)[Repealed.]

(d)

A majority of the members of the Board constitutes a quorum for transacting business and all action shall be taken upon a majority vote of the members present and voting.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 236

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 8.

§ 529.
Powers; duties.

In addition to its other powers and duties, the Board shall:

Provide general information to applicants.

Explain appeal procedures to licensees and applicants and complaint procedures to the public.

Conduct a competency evaluation where radiographic services are performed by licensees required to demonstrate competency under section 525 of this title to ensure that optimum radiologic technology practices are used to minimize patient and occupational radiation dose. The evaluation fee required under section 535 of this title shall not be assessed more than once in any two-year period against any licensee evaluated under this subdivision. The Director of the Office of Professional Regulation may contract with the Department of Health or others to perform evaluations under this subsection.

The Board may adopt rules necessary for the performance of its duties, including:

procedures for mandatory reporting of unsafe radiologic conditions or practices;

procedures for continued competency evaluation;

procedures for radiation safety;

procedures for competency standards for license applications and renewals;

rules relating to medical recordkeeping standards and release of medical records;

rules establishing requirements for licensing chiropractors with five years’ licensed experience in another jurisdiction of the United States or Canada.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 236

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1999, No. 52

, § 7;

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2009, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.